Louisiana, session 2026, HB4.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Legislative findings. The legislature finds that:
(A) It has been over fifty years since the Constitution of Louisiana became effective
at midnight on December 31, 1974, and during these years the document which constitutes
the state's basic law has been amended two hundred twenty-one times. At more than
seventy-five thousand words, the Constitution of Louisiana is one of the top five largest
constitutions in the nation.
(B) The constitution today contains too many provisions that restrict the legislature
from effectively addressing state and constituent needs, and the document also includes
Page 1 of 15

HLS 26RS-292 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 4
extensive provisions that are so detailed as to be statutory rather than constitutional in nature
and, as a result, require continual constitutional amendment when change is needed.
(C) The state constitution needs to be streamlined to the fundamental and
foundational law of the state, including the basic principles of the state, the structure of
government, and the fundamental rights of citizens. Other extremely detailed provisions in
the constitution should be transitioned out of the constitution and made statutory to allow
for flexibility and innovation in legislative solutions to problems of the present and the
future.
Section 2. The House Committee on House and Governmental Affairs and the
Senate Committee on Senate and Governmental Affairs shall meet prior to the 2027 Regular
Session of the Legislature to prepare legislation for introduction in the 2027 Regular Session
of the Legislature to provide for the calling of a constitutional convention. The committees
shall consider including in the proposed legislation the following proposals:
Proposal 1. Call for convention; delegates. (A) The constitutional convention shall
convene on Monday, April 10, 2028, at 12:00 noon, which shall be held for the purpose of
framing a new constitution for the state of Louisiana.
(B)(1) There shall be ninety-three delegates to the convention who shall be selected
as follows:
(a) Two delegates shall be elected from each of the districts from which members
of the Senate of the Legislature of Louisiana are elected as provided in R.S. 24:35.1.
(b) One delegate shall be elected from each of the districts from which
commissioners of the Public Service Commission are elected as provided in R.S. 45:1161.4.
(c) Ten delegates shall be appointed by the governor, none of whom shall be the
governor, the governor's spouse, or a member of the governor's executive staff.
(2) Each delegate to the convention shall be an elector of the state of Louisiana, shall
be at least eighteen years of age, and shall be a resident of the state of Louisiana. In
addition, each delegate elected from a district shall be a resident of the district from which
he is elected at the time he qualifies as a candidate for election as a delegate. Any public
official of the governmental subdivisions of the state, whether holding office by election or
Page 2 of 15

HLS 26RS-292 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 4
appointment, if otherwise qualified, shall be eligible for election or appointment as a
delegate of the convention.
(3) The secretary of state shall issue a commission to each delegate.
(4)(a) The service of a legislator or other public official or public employee as a
delegate to the convention and the employment or appointment of any public official or
public employee to the staff of the convention and his service on such staff shall not be
construed to constitute dual officeholding or dual employment within the prohibitions of Part
III of Chapter 2 of Title 42 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
(b) The service of a judge as a delegate to the convention shall not be construed as
grounds for recusal.
(c) Each delegate shall be considered to be an elected official within the scope of and
subject to the provisions of the Code of Governmental Ethics, Chapter 15 of Title 42 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950. Each staff member of the convention shall be
considered to be a public employee within the scope of and subject to the provisions of the
Code of Governmental Ethics, Chapter 15 of Title 42 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950. For purposes of Chapter 15 of Title 42 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, the
agency and the governmental entity of delegates and staff members of the convention shall
be the convention. For purposes of any other office or employment of any such delegate or
staff member, the provisions of Chapter 15 of Title 42 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950 shall remain applicable.
(d) Each delegate to the convention and each staff member of the convention shall
be considered to be a public officer, public official, public employee, or person in a position
of public authority for purposes of the application of the provisions of the Louisiana
Criminal Code.
(e) No delegate shall accept or deposit a contribution as defined in R.S. 18:1483 and
no campaign fundraising function shall be held for or by a delegate during the period of time
from Monday, April 10, 2028, through Sunday, October 15, 2028.
(f) The provisions of the Public Records Law shall apply to the convention, its
committees, and delegates to the same extent and with the same limitations as applicable to
records of the legislature and members of the legislature.
Page 3 of 15

HLS 26RS-292 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 4
(g) The provisions of the Open Meetings Law shall apply to the convention and its
committees in the same manner as applicable to the legislature and either house or
committees thereof.
(5) Any attorney at law serving as a delegate to the convention or as a member of
the staff of the convention shall be entitled to the absolute right of the continuance of any
case in which he is bona fide counsel of record in any court of the state during his attendance
upon the sessions of the convention or meetings of its committees of which he is a member.
(C)(1)(a) The election for the delegates to the convention shall be held at the open
primary election to be held on Saturday, March 25, 2028. The governor shall make
proclamation and give notice of the election to be held in accordance with R.S. 18:402(E)(1).
Each person desiring to become a candidate for election as a delegate from a district shall
qualify as a candidate from the district in which he resides by filing a notice of candidacy
beginning Wednesday, December 15, 2027, and ending Friday, December 17, 2027.
(b) For the delegates to be elected from each of the districts from which members
of the Senate of the Legislature of Louisiana are elected, the two delegates that receive the
highest number of votes shall be elected. If more than two candidates receive the highest
number of votes, the candidates who received the same number of votes shall be selected by
a public drawing of lots conducted by the State Board of Election Supervisors from among
the candidates who received the same number of votes in the election.
(c) For the delegates to be elected from each of the districts from which
commissioners of the Public Service Commission are elected, the candidate that receives the
highest number of votes shall be elected. If more than one candidate receives the highest
number of votes, the delegate shall be selected by a public drawing of lots conducted by the
State Board of Election Supervisors from among the candidates who received the highest
number of votes in the election.
(d) The public drawing of lots shall be conducted at the state capitol on a day and
at a time fixed by the board within one week after the results of the election become official.
The candidates involved shall be given at least three days' written notice of the time and
place of the public drawing of lots.
Page 4 of 15

HLS 26RS-292 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 4
(2) A candidate for delegate who qualifies to be elected from a district from which
members of the Senate of the Legislature of Louisiana are elected shall be considered a local
candidate and shall qualify with the clerk of court for the parish in which the candidate is
registered to vote. The candidate shall pay a qualifying fee of three hundred dollars. In
addition to this fee, a candidate shall pay an additional qualifying fee of twenty-five dollars,
which additional fee shall be deposited into the Campaign Sign Recycling Fund as provided
in R.S. 18:454.
(3) A candidate for delegate who qualifies to be elected from a district from which
commissioners of the Public Service Commission are elected shall be considered a state
candidate and shall qualify with the secretary of state or a person in his office designated to
receive qualifying papers. The candidate shall pay a qualifying fee of four hundred fifty
dollars. In addition to this fee, a candidate shall pay an additional qualifying fee of twenty-
five dollars, which additional fee shall be deposited into the Campaign Sign Recycling Fund
as provided in R.S. 18:454.
(4) The election shall otherwise be held and the results shall be promulgated in
accordance with the Louisiana Election Code. All qualified electors shall be entitled to vote
without regard to party affiliation. The costs of the election shall be paid as provided in the
Louisiana Election Code for elections in which a constitutional amendment appears on the
ballot.
(5) Delegates shall be elected by the qualified electors participating in the election
in the manner provided in Subpart F of Part IV of Chapter 5 of the Louisiana Election Code
for the election of candidates.
Proposal 2. Vacancies. (A) In the event of the resignation, death, or inability to
serve due to a documented illness of an elected delegate, whether before or during the
convention, the governor shall fill such vacancy by appointment of a person from the same
district from which the delegate was elected who possesses the provided qualifications.
(B) In the event of the resignation, death, or inability due to a documented illness
of an appointed delegate to serve, whether before or during the convention, the vacancy shall
be filled in the same manner and subject to the same qualifications as the original
appointment.
Page 5 of 15

HLS 26RS-292 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 4
Proposal 3. (A) Except as provided in Subsection B of this Proposal, the convention
shall have full authority to frame a new constitution for the state which shall be submitted
to the electors of the state for their approval or rejection at the open general election to be
held on Saturday, December 16, 2028.
(B) The proposed revision of the constitution shall provide that provisions of the
Constitution of Louisiana of 1974, as amended, that are not included in the new constitution
for the state shall be continued as statutes in a statutory title of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, as amended, dedicated to that purpose, which shall be established as Title
57.
(C) Any action by the convention in contravention of the provisions of this Proposal
shall be null and void and of no effect.
(D)(1) Any action to determine a question of the construction or validity of the Act
calling the constitutional convention, to determine the scope of authority of the convention,
or to determine the conformity of any action of the convention with the provisions of the Act
shall be brought in the Nineteenth Judicial District Court subject to direct appeal to the
Louisiana Supreme Court. The matter shall be tried by preference over other matters, and
the court shall render a decision as soon as practicable.
(2) If the action is to determine the validity or conformity of an action of the
convention, such action shall be brought within fifteen days of the action of the convention.
Proposal 4. Severability. (A) The provisions of the proposed revision of the
constitution shall be severable. If any provision of the proposed revision of the constitution
is deemed null and void and of no effect by final judgment of a court of competent
jurisdiction after adoption by the convention but prior to its submission to the electors, then
the provision deemed null and void shall be removed from the proposed revision of the
constitution by the secretary of state and the remainder of the proposed revision of the
constitution shall be submitted to the electors in accordance with the Act calling the
constitutional convention.
(B) If any provision of the revision of the constitution, or the application thereof, is
deemed invalid after ratification by the electors, such invalidity shall not affect other
Page 6 of 15

HLS 26RS-292 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 4
provisions, items, or applications of the revision which can be given effect without the
invalid provision, item, or application.
Proposal 5. Convention organization. (A)(1) The delegates to the convention shall
convene in the House Chamber in the state capitol on Monday, April 10, 2028, at 12:00
noon. The secretary of state shall preside until the chairman has been elected. The secretary
of state, or a designee of the secretary of state, shall attend the opening of the convention,
call the roll of the delegates, and administer the following oath to the delegates:
"I, . . ., do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support the constitution and laws of
the United States and the constitution and laws of this state and that I will faithfully and
impartially discharge and perform all the duties incumbent on me as a delegate to the
convention, according to the best of my ability and understanding, and that I will observe
and obey the limitation of authority contained in the Act under which this convention has
assembled. So help me God."
(2) No delegate shall be qualified to serve as such unless and until the delegate has
taken and subscribed to the oath.
(B) After the oath has been administered, the delegates shall proceed to effect the
permanent organization of the convention and shall:
(1) Elect from among their number a chairman and a vice chairman.
(2) Elect from among their number an executive committee, the membership of
which shall be determined by the delegates but which shall include the chairman and vice
chairman.
(3) Select a chief clerical officer of the convention from among the chief clerical
officers of the House of Representatives and the Senate and their assistants, who shall not
be a delegate and whose duties shall be provided by the rules of procedure for the
convention.
(4) Take such other actions as they deem necessary to effect a permanent
organization of the convention.
(C) The elections shall be conducted in the method provided for the election of
candidates as provided in R.S. 18:511 and 512.
Page 7 of 15

HLS 26RS-292 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 4
Proposal 6. (A) The convention shall establish fourteen committees, one committee
for each article of the Constitution of the State of Louisiana of 1974, which shall be charged
with the duty of reviewing and recommending changes to the article of the Constitution of
the State of Louisiana of 1974 to which it is assigned and one executive committee as
provided in Paragraph (B)(2) of this Section. No committee of the convention, including the
executive committee, shall exceed seventeen members and the rules shall so provide. No
committee of the convention may establish subcommittees, and the rules shall so provide.
(B) After completing organizational activities, the convention shall meet in
committees, in accordance with the schedule adopted by the House Committee on House and
Governmental Affairs and Senate Committee on Senate and Governmental Affairs. Each
committee that meets shall provide a report of its activities to the full convention no later
than Friday, September 15, 2028.
(C) The full convention shall convene beginning Saturday, September 16, 2028, to
consider as a committee of the whole the report of each committee. The chairman and vice
chairman of the convention shall serve as chairman and vice chairman of the committee of
the whole. The convention shall complete its work no later than Sunday, October 15, 2028.
Proposal 7. Legal advisor; staff; budget; committees. (A)(1) The attorney general
or a designee of the attorney general shall be the legal advisor to the convention.
(2) Staff support for the convention shall be provided by the staffs of the House of
Representatives, the Senate, the legislative fiscal office, the legislative auditor's office, and
other legislative agencies. In addition, as soon as possible after the members of the
executive committee are selected, the executive committee shall request the provision of
professional, research, technical, and clerical employees from any public or private sources
the committee deems necessary to accomplish the work of the convention.
(B) The staff of the constitutional convention may include but shall not be limited
to the following who shall not be delegates to the convention or registered as a legislative
or executive branch lobbyist with the Louisiana Board of Ethics on or after Thursday,
January 1, 2026, as provided in Chapter 1 of Title 24 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950 or in Chapter 1 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950:
Page 8 of 15

HLS 26RS-292 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 4
(1) A director of research who shall possess such qualifications as determined by the
executive committee.
(2) Research assistants in such number and possessing such qualifications as
determined by the executive committee.
(3) Personnel from the faculty of in-state law schools as requested by the executive
committee.
(4) Such other staff as the executive committee deems necessary.
(C) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if a staff member provided
to the convention is engaged in regular, bona fide employment, the staff member may
continue to be paid and receive the usual compensation and benefits from his employer while
the staff member is engaged in the work of the committee or the convention.
(D) As soon as possible after the members of the executive committee are elected,
the executive committee shall prepare a budget of anticipated expenses of the convention
based on the amount of the appropriation for the convention and any other funds of the state
general fund available for expenditure.
(E) The executive committee shall appoint the chairman, vice chairman, and the
membership of each committee.
(F) Unless the legislature is in session, the House Chamber, the Senate Chamber,
and the legislative committee rooms in the state capitol shall be available for use by the
convention and its committees. If the facilities at the state capitol are not available or are
not sufficient for use by the convention or its committees, the convention or its committees
shall meet at a suitable location in the capital city, which location shall be determined by the
chairman of the convention, and public notice of the location shall be given and posted at
suitable locations in the state capitol. The convention shall have full authority to use the
facilities and services of any board, commission, department, or agency of the state or of any
political subdivision of the state, and all such entities shall cooperate with the convention to
the fullest extent in furnishing services, facilities, and employees upon request. In addition,
the convention may use the facilities and services of other persons and organizations.
Proposal 8. Compensation of delegates. The delegates to the convention shall
receive the same per diem and travel allowances provided for members of the legislature
Page 9 of 15

HLS 26RS-292 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 4
pursuant to R.S. 24:31 and 31.1 for their attendance at the convention or any committee
thereof. No delegate shall receive a per diem or travel allowance for any day for which the
delegate also received a per diem or travel allowance for his duties for other public service.
No delegate may accept any compensation from any other source for work performed as a
delegate to the convention. However, if a delegate is engaged in regular, bona fide
employment, should the delegate's employer choose to continue to pay the usual
compensation while the delegate is engaged in the work of the convention, such delegate
may accept that compensation, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary.
Proposal 9. Appropriation; use of funds. (A) Any appropriation for the expenses
of the convention shall be used solely to defray the necessary expenses of the constitutional
convention, including the payment for supplies, materials, equipment, printing, and
reproduction of materials, and all other necessary expenses incurred in connection with the
convention and its work.
(B) Any funds appropriated for the convention shall be withdrawn from the state
treasury in accordance with warrants signed by the chairman of the convention, and all
checks for the disbursement of funds shall be signed by the chairman and the vice chairman
of the convention or by the chairman or vice chairman and such other person as shall be
designated by the convention.
(C) Expenses of the convention shall not be paid for by and the convention shall not
accept any grants, moneys, aid, facilities, or services from private sources.
(D) The convention shall not be deemed to be a budget unit of the state and therefore
shall not be subject to the provisions of Chapter 1 of Subtitle I of Title 39 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950. The financial books and records of the convention, however, shall
be subject to audit by the legislative auditor.
Proposal 10. Submission of proposed constitution; election. (A) Upon completion
of its work, and not later than Sunday, October 15, 2028, the convention shall submit a
proposed draft of a new constitution for the state to the governor. The constitution as drafted
by the convention shall be submitted to the people for adoption or rejection. Immediately
upon receipt of the proposed draft of the new constitution for the state, and no later than
Monday, October 16, 2028, the governor shall by proclamation call an election to be held
Page 10 of 15

HLS 26RS-292 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 4
at the same time as the 2028 open general election to be held on Saturday, December 16,
2028, for the purpose of submitting the proposed draft to the people for adoption or
rejection.
(B) The election shall be held and the results shall be promulgated in accordance
with the Louisiana Election Code. All electors duly qualified to vote in the state at the time
of the election shall be entitled to vote without regard to party affiliation on the proposition
for or against adoption of the revision of the constitution proposed by the convention. The
costs of the election shall be paid as provided in the Louisiana Election Code for elections
in which a constitutional amendment appears on the ballot.
(C)(1) The convention shall submit to the electors of the state the proposal of
acceptance or rejection of the constitution and may direct the proper election officials to take
the necessary steps to effectuate such determination of the convention in presenting the
proposed constitution to the electors. The ballot language shall be as follows:
"Do you support the adoption of the proposed 2029 Constitution?
(Vote for one)
FOR adoption of the proposed 2029 Constitution. ____
AGAINST adoption of the proposed 2029 Constitution. ____"
(2) Adoption of the constitution shall require the favorable vote of a majority of the
electors voting on the proposition.
(D) Upon promulgation of the results of the election by the secretary of state, if the
constitution is ratified and adopted by the people, the governor shall proclaim the
constitution to be the Constitution of Louisiana. The constitution shall become effective at
midnight on Friday, December 31, 2028, except as otherwise provided in the constitution
adopted.
Section 3.(A)(1) Prior to the convening of the 2027 Regular Session of the
Legislature, the House Committee on House and Governmental Affairs and Senate
Committee on Senate and Governmental Affairs, meeting jointly, shall propose the rules of
procedure for consideration, amendment, and adoption by the Legislature of Louisiana
during the 2027 Regular Session of the Legislature. The proposed rules shall be introduced
as a concurrent resolution in the 2027 Regular Session of the Legislature. If the legislature
Page 11 of 15

HLS 26RS-292 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 4
fails to adopt rules for the convention, the convention shall, upon convening, adopt rules
based upon the rules proposed by the joint committees.
(2) The rules proposed by the joint committees and adopted by the Legislature of
Louisiana shall be based upon the rules of the constitutional convention convened in 1973,
except as inconsistent with the provisions of this Act, and shall provide that on any question
of legislative procedure, when the rules are silent or inexplicit, Mason's Manual of
Legislative Procedure shall be considered as authority. The rules of procedure shall be
subject to later change by the delegates as provided therein. The rules shall provide that no
action shall be taken by the convention without the favorable vote of at least a majority of
the delegates and that no delegate shall be allowed to vote by proxy.
(B) Prior to the convening of the convention, the House Committee on House and
Governmental Affairs and Senate Committee on Senate and Governmental Affairs shall,
meeting jointly, adopt a schedule for the convention. The schedule proposed by the joint
committees shall provide for meetings for the convention and its committees.
(C) Adoption of any proposal by the joint committees shall require a favorable vote
of a majority of the members of each legislative committee present and voting, each house
voting separately, a quorum of the joint committee being present.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.